test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-deelw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# This gold standard is automatically generated from the Votic dictionary
# at Språkbanken (https://spraakbanken.gu.se/karp/#?mode=votiska)

Tests:
  Noun - deelõ :   # should decline like the paradigm 'p1_ahkõrõ..nn.1'
    deelõ+N+Sg+Nom: deelõ
    deelõ+N+Pl+Nom: deelõd
    deelõ+N+Sg+Gen: deela
    deelõ+N+Pl+Gen: deeloi
    deelõ+N+Sg+Par: deela
    deelõ+N+Pl+Par: [deeloi, deeloitõ]
    deelõ+N+Sg+Ill: [deelaa, deelasõ]
    deelõ+N+Pl+Ill: deeloisõ
    deelõ+N+Sg+Ine: deelaz
    deelõ+N+Pl+Ine: deeloiz
    deelõ+N+Sg+Ela: deelõssõ
    deelõ+N+Pl+Ela: deeloissõ
    deelõ+N+Sg+All: deelõllõ
    deelõ+N+Pl+All: deeloillõ
    deelõ+N+Sg+Ade: deelõl
    deelõ+N+Pl+Ade: deeloil
    deelõ+N+Sg+Abl: deelõssi
    deelõ+N+Pl+Abl: deeloissi
    deelõ+N+Sg+Tra: deelassi
    deelõ+N+Pl+Tra: deeloissi
    deelõ+N+Sg+Ter: deelassaa
    deelõ+N+Pl+Ter: deeloissaa
    deelõ+N+Sg+Com: deelaka
    deelõ+N+Pl+Com: deeloika
